Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-266
Irrigation water; overflow on roads; duty of owner to prevent; violation; penalty.

No owner of any water power or irrigation ditch, canal or lateral shall so construct, maintain or operate the same as to permit any water to escape therefrom upon any public road or highway. No person in the application of water in the irrigation of lands shall permit the same to escape from such lands and to flow upon any public road or highway. Any person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. Each day water is permitted to flow or escape upon any public road or highway in violation of the foregoing prohibitions shall be deemed a separate and distinct offense. The overseer of highways or other officer in charge of road work in the area in which a violation occurs shall make complaint therefor, but no other person shall be precluded from making complaint.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 3, § 21, p. 854;

C.S.1922, § 8471;

C.S.1929, § 46-621;

R.S.1943, § 46-266;

Laws 1959, c. 181, § 14, p. 660;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 261.